Montana, session 2025, HB605.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 46-5-105, MCA, is amended to read:
"46-5-105. Reasonable suspicion required before strip search -- exception -- FEE. (1) A Except as
provided in subsection (2), a person arrested or detained for a traffic offense or an offense that is not a felony
may not be subjected to a strip search or a body cavity search by a peace officer or law enforcement employee
unless there is reasonable suspicion to believe the person is concealing a weapon, contraband, or evidence of
the commission of a crime.
(2) If a person will be housed in a jail or correctional facility following an initial appearance or
arraignment for more than 12 hours, the person may be subjected to a strip search. For the purposes of this
subsection, the strip search conducted by a peace officer or law enforcement employee may not include
penetration of any body cavity. The strip search of the person must be conducted by a peace officer or law
enforcement employee of the same sex.
(3) Each county in the state of Montana shall pay a $250 fee to the department of justice to assist
in the development of guidelines for conducting strip searches."
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 605
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 605, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 605
INTRODUCED BY G. NIKOLAKAKOS, S. KELLY, S. FITZPATRICK, N. DURAM
AN ACT PROVIDING THAT A PERSON WHO WILL BE HOUSED IN A JAIL OR CORRECTIONAL FACILITY
FOR MORE THAN 12 HOURS MAY BE SUBJECT TO A STRIP SEARCH; PROVIDING FOR A FEE; AND
AMENDING SECTION 46-5-105, MCA.”